dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="l/e__v">
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ijIye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ijIye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ijIye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ijIye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eM</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eM</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eM</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eM</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>enA</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>enA</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>enA</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>enA</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ene</l><r>e<s n="v"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="le"><i>l</i><par n="l/e__v"/></e>
<e lm="xe"><i>x</i><par n="l/e__v"/></e>
